Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 8
APPLICABILITY OF PROCEDURE IN CLASS 1 FELONY CASES
FOR CRIMES COMMITTED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 1988,
AND PRIOR TO SEPTEMBER 20, 1991

Cross references:

For provisions relating to the imposition of sentences in class 1 felonies, see § 18-1.3-1201.

16-11-801 and 16-11-802. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This part 8 was added in 1991. For amendments to this part 8 prior to its repeal in 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this part 8 were relocated to part 13 of article 1.3 of title 18. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said part 13 and the comparative table located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.